Hawaii statutes.
[§122A-16] Courts-martial; nonjudicial
punishment. Any limitations in chapter 124A to the contrary
notwithstanding, whenever this chapter specifically authorizes an act to be
punished by court-martial or nonjudicial punishment, the court-martial may be convened
or nonjudicial punishment imposed and punishment administered as though the act
complained of were a violation of the punitive articles of chapter 124A. [L
1987, c 35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next